src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The APURINÃ language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
 PERS ;

LEXICON PERS
nuta+Pron+Pers+Sg1:nuta     Cases   ;
nuta+Pron+Pers+Pl1:atha     Cases   ;

pitha+Pron+Pers+Sg2:pitha     Cases   ;
pitha+Pron+Pers+Pl2:hỹtha     Cases   ;

ywa+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc:ywa     Cases   ;
ywa+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Msc:ywana     Cases   ;
ywa+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Fem:uwa     Cases   ;
ywa+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Fem:uwana     Cases   ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
