src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in UNDEFINED language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
ykynypuku+Pron:ykynypuku PRON_TOT "everything" ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
